New York, session 2025-2026, A9381.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 14 of section 396-z of the general business 2 law, as amended by chapter 109 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 14. (a) (i) A renter may not continue custody of a rental vehicle 5 beyond the period set forth in the rental agreement unless the rental 6 vehicle company has expressly consented to extend such period. 7 (ii) A rental vehicle company is authorized to regain custody of a 8 rental vehicle registered to such company subject to the procedures set 9 forth in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph where: 10 (1) A renter having custody of a vehicle pursuant to a rental agree- 11 ment specifying that such vehicle is to be returned to the rental vehi- 12 cle company at a certain date and time: 13 (A) intentionally retains custody of the vehicle, without the express 14 consent of the rental vehicle company, and continues such custody for a 15 period of more than twenty-four hours after the renter has been notified 16 that the vehicle is possessed beyond the period specified in the rental 17 agreement and must be returned immediately to the rental vehicle compa- 18 ny; 19 (B) obtains custody of the vehicle through materially false or fraudu- 20 lent pretenses, representations, or promises, including but not limited EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14256-04-6 A. 9381--B 2 1 to the use of another person's personal identifying information as 2 defined in section 190.77 of the penal law; or 3 (C) fails to remit payment in accordance with the rental agreement 4 after notification of arrears by the rental vehicle company; or 5 (2) The rental vehicle company has been notified by a law enforcement 6 agency that the vehicle is being used or has been used in furtherance of 7 criminal activity. 8 (iii) In the event a renter has engaged in any of the activities set 9 forth in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, subject to the notice 10 provisions established herein, a rental vehicle company is authorized to 11 recover its vehicle in accordance with standard business practices and 12 article 2-A of the uniform commercial code. Prior to taking any such 13 action, the rental vehicle company shall notify the renter at the 14 contact information provided by the renter and afford the renter with 15 the opportunity to either return the vehicle or, subject to the consent 16 of the rental vehicle company, extend the rental period. If the renter 17 does not respond to such notice or return the vehicle within twenty-four 18 hours of such notification, the rental vehicle company may take such 19 action consistent with standard business practices and article 2-A of 20 the uniform commercial code to locate and regain custody of the vehicle. 21 All attempts to notify the renter of the unauthorized use of the rental 22 vehicle shall be documented and maintained by the rental vehicle company 23 for sixty days after the vehicle has been returned or recovered or long- 24 er in the discretion of the rental vehicle company or required by an 25 arbitrator or court of law. 26 (b) An authorized driver shall provide notice to the rental vehicle 27 company and law enforcement agency within twelve hours of learning of 28 the theft of the rental vehicle. 29 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 165.05 of the penal law, 30 when a rental vehicle company has exhausted the remedies prescribed 31 herein to regain possession of a vehicle pursuant to this subdivision, 32 it may report the vehicle stolen to the appropriate law enforcement 33 agency. 34 § 2. Subdivision 14 of section 396-z of the general business law, as 35 amended by chapter 731 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 36 follows: 37 14. (a) (i) A renter may not continue custody of a rental vehicle 38 beyond the period set forth in the rental agreement unless the rental 39 vehicle company has expressly consented to extend such period. 40 (ii) A rental vehicle company is authorized to regain custody of a 41 rental vehicle registered to such company subject to the procedures set 42 forth in subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph where: 43 (1) A renter having custody of a vehicle pursuant to a rental agree- 44 ment specifying that such vehicle is to be returned to the rental vehi- 45 cle company at a certain date and time: 46 (A) intentionally retains custody of the vehicle, without the express 47 consent of the rental vehicle company, and continues such custody for a 48 period of more than twenty-four hours after the renter has been notified 49 that the vehicle is possessed beyond the period specified in the rental 50 agreement and must be returned immediately to the rental vehicle compa- 51 ny; 52 (B) obtains custody of the vehicle through materially false or fraudu- 53 lent pretenses, representations, or promises, including but not limited 54 to the use of another person's personal identifying information as 55 defined in section 190.77 of the penal law; or A. 9381--B 3 1 (C) fails to remit payment in accordance with the terms of the rental 2 agreement after notification of arrears by the rental vehicle company; 3 or 4 (iii) The rental vehicle company has been notified by a law enforce- 5 ment agency that the vehicle is being used or has been used in further- 6 ance of criminal activity. 7 (iv) In the event a renter has engaged in any of the activities set 8 forth in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, subject to the notice 9 provisions established herein, a rental vehicle company is authorized to 10 recover its vehicle in accordance with standard business practices and 11 article 2-A of the uniform commercial code. Prior to taking any such 12 action, the rental vehicle company shall notify the renter at the 13 contact information provided by the renter and afford the renter with 14 the opportunity to either return the vehicle or, subject to the consent 15 of the rental vehicle company, extend the rental period. If the renter 16 does not respond to such notice or return the vehicle within twenty-four 17 hours of such notification, the rental vehicle company may take such 18 action consistent with standard business practices and article 2-A of 19 the uniform commercial code to locate and regain custody of the vehicle. 20 All attempts to notify the renter of the unauthorized use of the rental 21 vehicle shall be documented and maintained by the rental vehicle company 22 for sixty days after the vehicle has been returned or recovered or long- 23 er in the discretion of the rental vehicle company or required by an 24 arbitrator or court of law. 25 (b) An authorized driver shall provide notice to the rental vehicle 26 company or law enforcement agency within twelve hours of learning of the 27 theft of the rental vehicle. 28 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 165.05 of the penal law, 29 when a rental vehicle company has exhausted the remedies prescribed 30 herein to regain possession of a vehicle pursuant to this subdivision, 31 it may report the vehicle stolen to the appropriate law enforcement 32 agency. 33 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided that the amend- 34 ments to section 396-z of the general business law, made by section one 35 of this act, shall be subject to the expiration and reversion of such 36 section pursuant to subdivision (a) of section 4 of chapter 109 of the 37 laws of 2018, as amended, when upon such date section two of this act 38 shall take effect.